Washington statutes.
RCW 10.19.160

Surrender of person under surety's bond.

The surety on the bond may return to custody a person in a criminal case under the surety's bond if the surrender is accompanied by a notice of forfeiture or a notarized affidavit specifying the reasons for the surrender. The surrender shall be made to the county or city jail affiliated with the jurisdiction issuing the warrant resulting in bail. Upon surrender, a person must be held until the next judicial day or until another bond is posted.

[ 2017 c 78 s 1; 1986 c 322 s 5.]

NOTES:

Severability—1986 c 322: See note following RCW 10.19.090.